Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.020

Exemptions.

The requirements of this chapter do not apply to:

(1) A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one employer and performs the functions of a private security guard solely in connection with the affairs of that employer, if the employer is not a private security company. However, in accordance with RCW 69.50.382, an employee engaged in cannabis-related transportation or delivery services on behalf of a common carrier must be licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter in order to be authorized to carry or use a firearm while providing such services;

(2) A sworn peace officer while engaged in the performance of the officer's official duties;

(3) A sworn peace officer while employed by any person to engage in off-duty employment as a private security guard, but only if the employment is approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the employment takes place and the sworn peace officer does not employ, contract with, or broker for profit other persons to assist him or her in performing the duties related to his or her private employer; or

(4)(a) A person performing crowd management or guest services including, but not limited to, a person described as a ticket taker, usher, door attendant, parking attendant, crowd monitor, or event staff who:

(i) Does not carry a firearm or other dangerous weapon including, but not limited to, a stun gun, taser, pepper mace, or nightstick;

(ii) Does not wear a uniform or clothing readily identifiable by a member of the public as that worn by a private security officer or law enforcement officer; and

(iii) Does not have as his or her primary responsibility the detainment of persons or placement of persons under arrest.

(b) The exemption provided in this subsection applies only when a crowd has assembled for the purpose of attending or taking part in an organized event, including preevent assembly, event operation hours, and postevent departure activities.

[ 2022 c 16 s 22; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 504; 2007 c 154 s 2; 2006 c 173 s 1; 1991 c 334 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Intent—Effective dates—2015 2nd sp.s. c 4: See notes following RCW 69.50.334.